Idaho, session 2025, H0222.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Idaho:
SECTION 1. That Chapter 25, Title 67, Idaho Code, be, and the same is
hereby amended by the addition thereto of a NEW SECTION, to be known and des-
ignated as Section 67-2512, Idaho Code, and to read as follows:
67-2512. STATE WEBSITES TO INCLUDE RULE AND POLICY DOCUMENTS. (1)
Each department of the state of Idaho identified in section 67-2402(1),
Idaho Code, including each division, bureau, section, commission, or other
sub-entity of the executive department of state and each constitutional
officer identified in section 67-2402(2), Idaho Code, shall, if such depart-
ment, sub-entity, or officer maintains a website, include on such website
any administrative rules or policies promulgated by the department, sub-en-
tity, or officer. The content required to be published pursuant to this
section shall be reviewed and updated by each department, sub-entity, or
officer at least annually to ensure that it remains current and accurate.
(2) Each website subject to the provisions of subsection (1) of this
section shall include the following statement: "Agency policy statements
and guidance documents shall not have the force and effect of law pursuant to
section 67-5207A, Idaho Code."
SECTION 2. An emergency existing therefor, which emergency is hereby
declared to exist, this act shall be in full force and effect on and after
July 1, 2025.